Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 8 Juvenile Courts

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Juvenile Courts § 1 et seq.

43 C.J.S. Infants § 7.

§ 5-8-101.
Establishment; judges; courts of record.

Courts are established
in each county of the state known as the “Juvenile Court of
. . . . .
County, Wyoming.” The district court
judges of the state shall be the judges of the juvenile courts in
the counties of their respective districts. Each juvenile court shall
be a court of record with a seal and the judge, commissioner and clerk
thereof have power to administer oaths and affirmations.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

§ 5-8-102.
Jurisdiction.

The juvenile court has general jurisdiction in all matters and proceedings commenced therein or transferred to it by order of the district court concerning:

Any minor alleged to be delinquent as defined in W.S.

14-6-201

;

Any minor alleged to have committed a delinquent act before attaining the age of majority;

Any minor alleged to be neglected as defined in W.S.

14-3-402

;

Any minor alleged to be in need of supervision as defined in W.S.

14-6-402

;

The parents, guardian or custodian of any minor alleged to be delinquent, in need of supervision or neglected, and all persons living in the household with the minor; and

Procedures governing abortions performed upon minors as provided under W.S.

35-6-118

. For proceedings under this paragraph, “minor” shall mean as defined in W.S. 35-6-101(a)(x).

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Jurisdiction properly invoked. —

Denial of transfer motion. —

Jurisdiction properly invoked. —

Juvenile court’s jurisdiction was properly invoked because the State filed a petition while the child was a minor alleging that the mother had neglected her. RH v. State (In the Interest of BG), 2019 WY 116, 451 P.3d 1161,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2019).

Denial of transfer motion. —

Legislature intended the court’s concurrent jurisdiction to include jurisdiction over matters involving an offender who had reached the age of majority but was alleged to have committed a criminal offense as a child; in reading the Juvenile Justice Act as a whole, and in harmony with the grant of general jurisdiction to juvenile courts, it was apparent that the legislature understood and intended that a juvenile court’s jurisdiction would extend to child offenders who had attained the age of majority. Rosen v. State, 2022 WY 16, 503 P.3d 41,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2022).